California statutes. Financial Code
If the commissioner is unable to perform his or her duties for more than 30 consecutive days or if the office of the commissioner becomes vacant, the chief deputy shall have all the powers and duties of the commissioner until the return or recovery of the commissioner, or, in case of a vacancy, until a new commissioner is appointed by the Governor and qualifies to hold office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

357.

If a deputy commissioner or any examiner has knowledge of the insolvency or unsafe condition of any licensee and willfully fails to report that fact to the commissioner in writing, he or she is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration of the Department [370. - 382.]

370.

The commissioner may have an office in the City of Sacramento, the City of Los Angeles, the City of San Diego, the City and County of San Francisco, or any other location in the state that he or she considers appropriate. The commissioner shall provide at the expense of the department such office space, furniture, and equipment as may be necessary or convenient for the transaction of the business of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

372.

The department may expend moneys in accordance with law for the necessary travel expenses of officers and employees of the department while traveling in the line of their duties either within or without the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

373.

The commissioner shall adopt and keep an official seal. Papers executed by the commissioner in his or her official capacity pursuant to law and bearing the seal, or copies thereof certified by him or her, shall be received in evidence in like manner as the original and may be recorded in the same manner and with the same effect as a deed regularly acknowledged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

374.

(a) Whenever it is necessary for the commissioner to approve any instrument and to affix his or her official seal thereto, the commissioner shall charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) therefor.

(b) Whenever it is proper for the department to furnish a copy of any paper that has been filed therein and to certify to the paper, the commissioner may charge twenty-five cents ($0.25) for each page
 copied.

(c) Whenever the commissioner is required or requested to certify copies of documents, the commissioner may charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) for certifying the copied documents and for affixing his or her official seal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

375.

Official reports made by the commissioner and verified reports of an examination made by the commissioner, exclusively or in conjunction with or with assistance from any agency of the United States, of a state of the United States, or of a foreign nation are prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the reports for all purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

376.

At least once each month, the commissioner shall issue and disseminate as the commissioner deems appropriate a bulletin containing the following information:

(a) Information regarding any of the following actions taken since issuance of the previous bulletin:

(1) The filing, approval, or denial under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 1.1 of an application for authority to organize a California state bank, or the issuance under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1040) of Division 1.1 of a certificate of authority to a California state bank.

(2) The filing, approval, or
 denial under Article 1 (commencing with Section 5400) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of an application for the issuance of an organizing permit for the organization of a California savings association, or for the issuance under Article 2 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of a certificate of authority to a California savings association.

(3) The filing, approval, or denial under Article 2 (commencing with Section 14150) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of an application for a certificate to act as a credit union, or the issuance of a certificate to engage in the business of a credit union.

(4) The filing, approval, or denial under Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000), Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), or Division 15 (commencing with Section 31000) of
 an application for a license to engage in business, or the issuance under any of those laws of a license to engage in business.

(5) The filing, approval, or denial under Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) of Division 1.1 of an application by a foreign (other nation) bank to establish its first office of any particular class (as determined under Section 1753) in this state, or the issuance under that chapter of a license in connection with the establishment of such an office.

(6) The filing, approval, or denial under Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800) of an application for approval of a sale, merger, or conversion.

(7) The filing, approval, or denial under Article 6 (commencing with Section 5700) of
 Chapter 2 of Division 2 of an application for approval of a conversion of a federal savings association into a state savings association, or the filing of a federal charter of a state savings association that has converted to a federal savings association.

(8) The filing, approval, or denial under Article 7 (commencing with Section 5750) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of an application for approval of a reorganization, merger, consolidation, or transfer of assets of a state savings association.

(9) The filing, approval, or denial under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 15200) of Division 5 of an application for approval of a merger, dissolution, or conversion of a credit union.

(10) The taking of possession of the property and
 business of a California state bank, savings association, credit union, or person licensed by the commissioner under any of the laws cited in paragraph (4).

(b) Other information as the commissioner deems appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 21.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

377.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, whenever any provision of the Financial Institutions Law requires the pledge of securities to be deposited with the Treasurer, to ensure the performance of any act or duty, the securities after first being approved by the commissioner and upon the written order of the commissioner, shall be deposited with the Treasurer. The Treasurer, with the consent of the owner of the securities deposited or to be deposited with the Treasurer, may place the securities in the custody of a qualified trust company or bank in the same manner and under the same conditions provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 16550) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 22.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

378.

Whenever the commissioner is notified of or discovers a violation of the state law punishable by criminal penalties, he or she shall promptly advise the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

379.

(a) For the purposes of this section the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Control” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1250. “Control” also means the ownership of a subject person by means of sole proprietorship, partnership, or by any other similar means.

(2) “Controlling person” means a person who, directly or indirectly, controls a subject person.

(3) “Subject person” means any licensee.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and subject to subdivision (c), the
 commissioner may deliver, or cause to be delivered, to local, state, or federal law enforcement agencies fingerprints taken of any of the following:

(1) An applicant for employment with the department.

(2) A person licensed, or proposed to be licensed, as a subject person.

(3) A director, officer, or employee of an existing or proposed subject person.

(4) An existing or proposed controlling person of a subject person.

(5) A director, officer, or employee of an existing or proposed controlling person of a subject person.

(6) A
 director, officer, or employee of an existing or proposed affiliate of a subject person.

(c) The authorization in subdivision (b) may only be used by the department for the purpose of obtaining information regarding an individual as to the existence and nature of the criminal record, if any, of that individual relating to convictions, and to any arrest for which the individual is released on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial, for the commission or attempted commission of a crime involving robbery, burglary, theft, embezzlement, fraud, forgery, bookmaking, receiving stolen property, counterfeiting, or involving checks or credit cards or using computers.

(d) No request shall be submitted pursuant to this section without the written consent of the person
 affected.

(e) Any criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section shall be confidential and no recipient shall disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 23.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

380.

(a) The commissioner shall inform appropriate state and federal officials charged with the regulation of financial institutions or securities transactions of any enforcement actions, including, but not limited to, civil or criminal actions, cease and desist orders, license or authorization suspensions or revocations, or an open investigation.

(b) The commissioner shall inform appropriate state and federal officials charged with the regulation of financial institutions or securities transactions if it appears that any bank, bank holding company, savings association, savings and loan holding company, credit union, industrial loan company, industrial loan holding company, or other licensee of the department is conducting its business in a fraudulent, unsafe, unsound, or
 injurious manner, or has suffered or will suffer substantial financial loss or damage, and it appears to the commissioner that the information is relevant to the regulatory activities of the other agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 401, Sec. 25.   (AB 2763)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

381.

Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to hearings conducted by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

382.

(a) The department shall require fingerprint images from any department employee, prospective employee or applicant seeking employment within the department, contractor, subcontractor, or volunteer who may have access to criminal offender record information.

(b) The fingerprint images described in subdivision (a) shall be furnished to the Department of Justice for the purpose of obtaining state- and national-level criminal record information, and to determine the existence and nature of any of the following:

(1) A record of state or federal convictions and the existence and nature of state or federal arrests for which the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(2) Being convicted of, or pleading nolo contendere to, a crime, or having committed an act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person in accordance with this provision.

(3) Any conviction or arrest for which the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal that has a reasonable nexus to the information or data that the person will be given access.

(c) When the Department of Justice receives a request for national-level criminal offender record information, it shall forward the request to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response as provided under
 subdivision (k) or (o) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code to the department.

(d) The department shall request subsequent arrest notifications from the Department of Justice as provided under Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(e) The Department of Justice may assess a fee sufficient to cover the processing costs required under this section, as authorized pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “criminal offender record information” means the same as defined in Section 13102 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 6.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Financial Institutions Fund [400. - 400.]

400.

As of the operative date of this section, there is established a Financial Institutions Fund in the State Treasury. Except as otherwise provided in Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000), all money collected or received by the commissioner under this code shall be deposited with the Treasurer to the credit of the Financial Institutions Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. State Banking Account [405. - 414.]

405.

(a) The commissioner shall annually collect pro rata from the banks and trust companies under the supervision of the department a fund in an amount sufficient in the commissioner’s judgment to meet the expenses of the department in administering laws relating to banks or trust companies or to the banking or trust business that are not otherwise provided for and to provide a reasonable reserve for contingencies.

(b) The amount of the annual assessment for the fund on any bank or trust company shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000). Above that minimum amount, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the annual assessment shall not exceed the sum of the products of
 a base assessment rate, or percentage thereof, and segregated portions of its total resources, according to the following table: Segregated Total ResourcesPercentage of Base(In Millions or Fractions Thereof)Assessment RateFirst $2100.0Next $18 50.0Next $80 12.0Next $100 6.25Next $8006.0Next $1,0004.0Next $4,0003.5Next $14,0003.0Next $20,0002.5Excess over $40,0001.5(c) (1) For purposes of determining the annual assessment on
 banks and trust companies that have one or more foreign (other state) branch offices, the resources of foreign (other state) branch offices shall be excluded from total resources, except that the commissioner may order the resources of foreign (other state) branch offices to be included in total resources if and to the extent that it is necessary in the commissioner’s judgment to meet the expenses of the department on account of foreign (other state) branch offices and a reasonable reserve for contingencies.

(2) If the commissioner finds that a bank or trust company allocated any resource to a foreign (other state) branch office for the purpose, in whole or in part, of reducing its annual assessment, the commissioner may, for purposes of calculating the annual assessment on the bank or trust company, reallocate the resource to
 the bank’s or trust company’s head office.

(d) The base assessment rate shall be set by the commissioner from time to time at the commissioner’s discretion, not to exceed two dollars and twenty cents ($2.20) per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of total resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 24.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

The commissioner shall annually collect from national banking associations and foreign (other state) banks operating trust departments in this state an annual assessment to meet expenses of the department, not exceeding one one-hundredth of 1 percent of the amount required by law to be deposited with the Treasurer as surety for the faithful performance and execution of all court and private trusts accepted by them.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

Whenever the commissioner makes an assessment pursuant to Section 405 or 406, the commissioner shall fix the date when the assessment is due and payable and shall mail or otherwise deliver to each bank and trust company assessed an invoice showing the amount of its assessment and the date when the assessment is due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

The commissioner, in addition to the annual assessment, shall collect from each bank authorized to engage in the trust business, to defray the cost of examination, a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner. The commissioner shall assess the fee upon completion of the examination of the trust company or trust business and shall mail or otherwise deliver an invoice for the fee to the institution. The institution shall pay the fee within 30 days after the invoice is mailed or otherwise delivered to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 7.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

409.

If any bank or trust company fails to make timely payment of any assessment made pursuant to Section 405, 406, or 408, the commissioner may, in the commissioner’s sole discretion, (a) cancel the certificate of authority of the bank or trust company to conduct a banking or trust business or (b) levy a civil penalty pursuant to Section 329.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

410.

As of the operative date of this section:

(a) The State Banking Fund is converted into a separate account in the Financial Institutions Fund and designated as the State Banking Account.

(b) All moneys and other assets and all liabilities of the State Banking Fund shall be transferred to the State Banking Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 413 or 414, all salaries and other expenses of the department, other than those incurred in administering laws relating to savings associations or the savings association business, credit unions or the credit union business, industrial banks, the industrial banking business, insurance premium finance agencies, the insurance premium finance business, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the
 Government Code, shall be paid out of the State Banking Account in the Financial Institutions Fund. Salaries and other expenses incurred in the liquidation or conservation of any bank (other than an industrial bank) or of any person licensed under Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000) or Division 15 (commencing with Section 31000), including the compensation of employees of the department to the extent that they are engaged in that liquidation or conservation, if possible, and if advanced from the State Banking Account in the Financial Institutions Fund, shall constitute a first charge against the assets of the bank or licensee, as the case may be. Salaries and other expenses incurred in the liquidation or conservation of any industrial bank, including the compensation of employees of the department to the extent that they are engaged in that liquidation or conservation, if possible, and if advanced from the Industrial Bank Account in the Financial Institutions Fund, shall constitute a first charge
 against the assets of the industrial bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

The commissioner shall deliver all moneys received or collected by the commissioner under Section 405, 406, or 408 or otherwise, other than moneys received or collected by the commissioner under laws relating to savings associations, the savings association business, credit unions, the credit union business, industrial banks, the industrial banking business, insurance premium finance agencies, the insurance premium finance business, or Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter
 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, to the Treasurer, who shall deposit the moneys to the credit of the State Banking Account of the Financial Institutions Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

(a) In this section, “assessment statute” means any statute that authorizes the commissioner to make or collect an assessment (other than a fine) on financial institutions, including the following:

(1) Sections 405 to 407, inclusive.

(2) Section 2042.

(3) Article 2 (commencing with Section 8030) of Chapter 7 of Division 2.

(4) Article 4 (commencing with Section 14350) of Chapter 3 of Division 5.

(5) Section 1533.

(b) The commissioner may charge to and collect from the Financial Institutions Fund, the Credit Union Fund, each of the accounts included in the Financial Institutions Fund, and each of the programs included in the State Banking Account an amount equal to the fund’s, account’s, or program’s pro rata share of those expenses of the department which, in the opinion of the commissioner, it is not feasible to attribute to any single one of the funds, accounts, or programs. The fund’s, account’s, or program’s pro rata share shall be determined and paid in the manner and at the time ordered by the commissioner.

(c) The provisions of any assessment statute that authorize the commissioner to make or collect an assessment for the purposes specified in the assessment statute include authority
 for the commissioner to make and collect an assessment for the additional purpose of providing money in an amount that will, in the commissioner’s judgment, be sufficient to make payments that may be required under subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 25.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

414.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of Section 53667 of the Government Code, the commissioner may, at any time during a fiscal year, pay any expense of the department from any of the following accounts and funds: the State Banking Account, the Savings and Loan Account, the Industrial Bank Account, the Financial Institutions Fund, the Credit Union Fund, and the Local Agency Deposit Security Fund. However, if the commissioner pays an expense of the department from an account
 or fund from which the expense is not, except for this section, permitted to be paid, the commissioner shall, as of a date within that fiscal year, reimburse the account or fund from which the expense was paid by making a transfer from the account or fund from which the expense would have been permitted to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Operations [450. - 464.]

450.

(a) In this section, “governmental agency” includes, without limitation, any agency of this state, of any other state of the United States, of the United States, or of any foreign nation.

(b) The commissioner may furnish information to a governmental agency that regulates financial institutions.

(c) The commissioner may furnish to a
 governmental agency that administers a loan guarantee or similar program, information relating to a person who participates in the program.

(d) The commissioner may furnish to a governmental agency that regulates business activities, other than the type described in subdivision (b), information relating to any of the following:

(1) A suspected violation of a law administered by the agency.

(2) A person involved in an application to the agency for a license, approval, or other authorization.

(e) The commissioner may furnish to a governmental agency that is a law enforcement agency information relating to a suspected crime.

(f) The commissioner may furnish information to any person who
 provides share insurance or guaranty of the shares of a credit union in accordance with Section 14858, 16004, or 16503.

(g) The commissioner may furnish confidential information regarding a licensee to the directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, and consultants of that licensee in accordance with Section 452.

(h) This section does not prescribe the only circumstances under which the commissioner may furnish information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

With the prior approval of the commissioner, a foreign (other state) or foreign (other nation) financial institutions regulatory agency may examine a licensee and any of its offices, provided that the agency has a regulatory interest in the licensee. Any regulatory agency approved by the commissioner under this section shall be considered a supervisory agency under subdivision (f) of Section 7480 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

(a) Directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, or consultants of a licensee may not disclose in any manner to any person confidential information regarding the licensee received from the commissioner. The prohibition in this section shall not apply to disclosures of confidential information by directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, or consultants of the licensee:

(1) Made
 pursuant to a subpoena or other discovery proceeding.

(2) Made to any state or federal prosecuting or investigatory agency or authority.

(3) Made to any state, federal, or foreign (other nation) financial institutions regulatory agency that has a direct regulatory interest in the licensee.

(4) Made to any state or federal taxing agency.

(5) Made as otherwise required by law.

(6) Made as otherwise authorized by the commissioner in writing.

(b) Any director, officer, employee, attorney, accountant, or consultant that discloses confidential information in a manner other than allowed by this section shall be liable for a civil
 penalty not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The commissioner may impose a penalty under this section in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 329.

(c) The prohibition set forth in subdivision (a) shall not apply to any discussion, analysis, or other use of confidential information provided by the commissioner that occurs between directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants, or consultants of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

Every licensee shall make and file with the commissioner whenever required by him or her a report in any form as the commissioner may prescribe and verified in any manner the commissioner prescribes, showing its financial condition and any other information as the commissioner may require at the close of business on any day designated by him or her. Any verification shall state that each of the officers making the verification has a personal knowledge of the matters in the report and that
 each of them believes that each statement in the report is true.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

454.

The commissioner shall call for the report specified in Section 453 from all licensees at least four times each year upon dates selected by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

455.

The commissioner may at any time require any licensee to make and file with him or her a special report furnishing any information as the commissioner may specify when necessary to inform him or her fully of the actual financial condition and all other affairs of the licensee. The reports shall be in the form and filed on a date prescribed by the commissioner and shall, if required by the commissioner, be verified in any manner that he or she prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

456.

Every licensee shall keep its corporate records, financial records, and books of account in words and figures of the English language and in form satisfactory to the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

457.

Every licensee shall notify the commissioner of any change in the following officers of the licensee, to the extent that those officers exist within the licensee: chairperson, chief executive officer, president, general manager, managing officer, chief financial officer, or chief credit officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

458.

(a) Each report required under this article, or under any other provision of law administered by the commissioner, shall be filed with the commissioner at the time that the commissioner may require. If any licensee fails to make any required report at the time specified by the commissioner or fails to include therein any matter required by this article, any provision of law administered by the commissioner, or by the commissioner, it shall be liable to the people of
 this state in the sum of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each day that the report is delayed or withheld by the failure or neglect of the licensee.

(b) The provisions of Section 329 shall not apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

459.

(a) Every licensee shall file with the commissioner one copy of all material filed by the licensee with a federal agency that is charged with the supervision and regulation of that licensee, or a law enforcement agency.

(b) Each copy required to be filed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be filed with the commissioner on or before the date upon which the original is filed with the agencies specified in subdivision (a) and shall be available for inspection by the public except to the extent the information contained therein is accorded confidential treatment under state or federal law or regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 9.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

460.

Any person intentionally making a false statement in any report required to be rendered under this article or other provision of law administered by the commissioner is guilty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

461.

Any debt due a licensee on which interest is past due and unpaid for the period of one year shall be charged off, unless the debt is well secured or is in process of collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

462.

Any person that provides services to any licensee, at the request of the commissioner, shall submit to an examination by the commissioner. Should the commissioner deem it necessary or desirable that an examination be made of a person, the examination shall be made at the expense of the person examined. If the person refuses to permit an examination to be made, the commissioner may order every licensee receiving services from that person to discontinue receiving those services or otherwise
 conducting business with that person, and the licensees shall comply with that order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

463.

(a) All references in this code and the Corporations Code to financial statements, balance sheets, income statements, and statements of changes in financial position of a licensee, and all references to assets, liabilities, earnings, retained earnings, shareholders’ equity, net worth, and similar accounting items of a licensee, mean those financial statements or those items prepared or determined in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles then
 applicable in the United States, fairly presenting in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles accepted in the United States the matters which they purport to present, subject to any specific accounting treatment required by any applicable provision of the Corporations Code, this code, or any regulation, order issued by the commissioner, or agreement entered into by the commissioner and a licensee.

(b) The commissioner may, by regulation or order, require that any financial statement or accounting item of a licensee be prepared or determined in a manner other than in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles accepted in the United States if the commissioner finds that such other manner is necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes or provisions of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

464.

(a) An officer of a financial institution, within the meaning of Section 1101(1) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3401(1)), shall furnish the State Department of Health Care Services or its designee with information in the possession of the bank or company regarding the assets of any person who is applying for, or is receiving assistance or benefits from, the State Department of Health Care Services and has provided authorization
 pursuant to Section 14013.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) The obtaining of financial records by the State Department of Health Care Services, or its designee, pursuant to this section shall be subject to the cost reimbursement requirements of Section 1115(a) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3415(a)) and shall be at no cost to the applicant, recipient, or any other person, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 14013.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) An authorization obtained by the State Department of Health Care Services, or its designee, under Section 14013.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be considered as meeting the requirements of Section 1103(a) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3403(a)) and, notwithstanding Section 1104(a) of the federal Right to
 Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3404(a)), need not be furnished to the financial institution.

(d) The certification requirements of Section 1103(b) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3403(b)) shall not apply to requests by the State Department of Health Care Services, or its designee, pursuant to an authorization provided under Section 14013.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) A request by the State Department of Health Care Services, or its designee, pursuant to an authorization provided under Section 14013.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be deemed to meet the requirements of Section 1104(a)(3) of the federal Right to Financial Privacy Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3404(a)(3)) and of Section 1102 of the act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3402), relating to a reasonable description of financial records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Examinations and Reports-Banking [500. - 521.]



  ARTICLE 1. Examination [500. - 509.]

500.

(a) (1) For purposes of this section, “foreign bank” means the business in this state of every foreign (other nation) bank licensed under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1800) of Chapter 20 of Division 1.1.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an examination made by the commissioner in conjunction with or with assistance from a bank regulatory agency of the United States, of a
 state of the United States, or of a foreign nation is deemed to be an examination caused by the commissioner.

(3) No provision of this subdivision shall be deemed to require that the commissioner cause an examination to be made onsite at the offices of a bank.

(4) The commissioner shall cause every California state bank and every foreign bank to be examined to the extent and whenever and as often as the commissioner shall deem it advisable, but in no case less frequently than once every 12 months, except that the following banks shall be examined pursuant to federal law no less frequently than state banks and foreign banks that meet the respective federal criteria:

(A) California state banks that meet the criteria set forth in Section 1820(d)(4) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(B) Foreign banks that meet the criteria set forth in Section 211.26(c)(2) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) The examinations required by paragraph (4) may be conducted in alternate examination periods, as appropriate, if the commissioner determines that an examination of the state bank by the appropriate federal regulator, insuring or guaranteeing corporation during the intervening examination period carries out the purpose of this section. The commissioner may not accept two consecutive examinations, or two consecutive examination reports, made by federal regulators, insuring or guaranteeing corporations, or agencies with respect to the condition of the state bank.
